Washington statutes.
RCW 11.102.020

Accounting.

Unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction the bank or trust company operating such common trust funds is not required to render a court accounting with regard to such funds; but it may, by application to the superior court, secure approval of such an accounting on such conditions as the court may establish.

[ 1985 c 30 s 80. Prior: 1955 c 33 s 30.28.020; prior: 1943 c 55 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 3388-1. Formerly RCW 30.28.020.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.